New York, session 2025-2026, S7709.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 3423 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3423. Renters insurance; alternative forms of identification. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other law to 5 the contrary, every insurer issuing a policy or contract for renters 6 insurance as defined by section thirty-four hundred fifty-four of this 7 article, shall accept, in lieu of a social security number, a municipal 8 identification card, or other state or local government-issued identifi- 9 cation card. The insurer may also require, as proof of identity, a nota- 10 rized copy of the rental lease signed by the property owner, the proper- 11 ty management firm and the insured. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03388-01-5